bulgarian.aff
flag *X:
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿À»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ»
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿Õ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÕŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿ÕŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,¿“
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,¿’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈… »
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈À»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ã
    ¿        >      -¿,≈“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ
    ¿        >      -¿,≈ÿ≈
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ»
    ¿        >      -¿,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,»
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂ’“≈
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸ¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸŒ
    ¿        >      -¿,ﬂŸŒ“Œ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ¿“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈À»
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈À»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Ã
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈Õ»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÕŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÕŒ“Œ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÿ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒ≈ÿ≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’Ã≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒŒ’“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂÀŒ“Œ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’Ã≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,ƒﬂ’“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,…
    Ã        >      -Ã,…“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,À
    Ã        >      -Ã,À¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,À¿“¿
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»“≈
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»ﬂ
    Ã        >      -Ã,À»ﬂ“
    Ã        >      -Ã,ÀŒ
    Ã        >      -Ã,ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿Õ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿ÕŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿ÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,¿’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“
